Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 60
PARENTAL RIGHTS IN EDUCATION

Section.

33-6001. Parental rights.

A student’s parent or guardian has the right to reasonable academic accommodation from the child’s public school. “Reasonable accommodation” means the school shall make its best effort to enable a parent or guardian to exercise their rights without substantial impact to staff and resources, including employee working conditions, safety and supervision on school premises for school activities and the efficient allocation of expenditures, while balancing the parental rights of parents and guardians, the educational needs of other students, the academic and behavioral impacts to a classroom, a teacher’s workload and the assurance of the safe and efficient operations of the school.

School districts and the boards of directors of public charter schools, in consultation with parents, teachers and administrators, shall develop and adopt a policy to promote the involvement of parents and guardians of children enrolled in the schools within the school district or the charter school, including:

A plan for parent participation in the schools that is designed to improve parent and teacher cooperation in such areas as homework, attendance and discipline;

A process by which parents may learn about the course of study for their children and review learning materials, including the source of any supplemental educational materials; and

A process by which parents who object to any learning material or activity on the basis that it harms the child or impairs the parents’ firmly held beliefs, values or principles may withdraw their child from the activity, class or program in which the material is used.

33-6002. Annual notice of parental rights.

School districts and the boards of directors of public charter schools shall annually notify a parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the school district or public charter school of the parent’s or guardian’s rights as specified in this chapter.